Utah statutes.
76-10-509.9.   Sales of firearms to juveniles.

(1)  A person may not sell any firearm to a minor under 18 years of age unless the minor is accompanied by a parent or guardian.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 13, 1993 Special Session 2

